Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-370
Resolution of county board; notice; objections; effect.

The county may set up an improvement district as provided in section 23-369 by resolution of the county board and after the passage, approval, and publication of such resolution shall publish notice of the creation of such street improvement district or districts for two consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper published in and of general circulation in such county or, if none is published in the county, in a legal newspaper of general circulation in such county. If a majority of the owners of record title of the property directly abutting on the street or streets improved shall file with the county clerk within twenty days after the first publication of such notice written objections to the creation of such district or districts, the improvements shall not be made, as provided in such resolution, but such resolution shall be repealed.

Laws 1961, c. 93, § 3, p. 320;

Laws 1986, LB 960, § 20.